District of Columbia statutes.
42-704

Posthumous children.

Where a future estate shall be limited to heirs, or issue, or children, posthumous children shall be entitled to take in the same manner as if living at the death of their parent; and a future estate depending on the contingency of the death of any person without heirs, or issue, or children shall be defeated by the birth of a posthumous child of such person.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1352, ch. 854, § 1028

Cross References

Personal property, applicable laws, see § 42-523.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 42-523.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-404.
1973 Ed., § 45-204.